Connecticut, session 2026, HB05159.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"local news organization" means a news organization, as defined in
section 54-33i of the general statutes, that is located in the state.
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Office of Policy and Management shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with a student journalism collaborative
for such collaborative to establish a journalism fellowship program to
fund not fewer than twelve journalism fellowships at one or more local
news organizations. The memorandum of understanding shall specify
the (1) minimum requirements for a fellowship funded under such
program, including, but not limited to, opportunities for (A) a
mentorship from experienced journalists and editors, (B) direct work
experience, and (C) professional networking, (2) eligibility requirements
for individuals to qualify for such journalism fellowships, including, but
not limited to, (A) graduating from a journalism degree program at a
public institution of higher education in the state, and (B) interviewing
with and being approved by the local news organization providing such
fellowship, (3) amount at which such fellowships shall be funded, and
(4) requirement for the collaborative to post, not later than September 1,
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5159
2026, in a conspicuous location on its Internet web site (A) a description
of the journalism fellowship program, including, but not limited to, the
amount of funding available for each fellowship under such program,
(B) the minimum requirements and eligibility requirements specified
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, (C) the list of
fellowships with funding available under such program, and (D) the
application form for such program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 2 of 2